Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 8. Winding Up Partnership Business

Division in kind held not practical. —

Where plaintiff had only comparatively small interest in partnership property, division in kind would not be practical on dissolution of partnership and trial court did not err by indirectly setting partnership property over to defendants and awarding personal judgment to plaintiff. Nick v. John, 61 Wyo. 290, 157 P.2d 563,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1945) (judgment modified to give plaintiff lien on partnership property).

Giving effect to terms of agreement. —

Where defendant chose to carry on the business of a medical clinic and had done so, and he did not cause a dissolution of the partnership in contravention of a partnership agreement, the winding up of partnership affairs, the settling of accounts between the partners, and the distribution of assets should have been under the terms of the partnership agreement; and full effect should have been given to the provision in such agreement which deprived a retiring partner of any interest in accounts receivable, if he continued to practice in the same county within one year. Thickman v. Schunk, 410 P.2d 987,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1966).

Effect should be given to agreement. —

Where defendant chose to carry on the business of a medical clinic and had done so, and he did not cause a dissolution of the partnership in contravention of a partnership agreement, the winding up of partnership affairs, the settling of accounts between the partners, and the distribution of assets should have been under the terms of the partnership agreement; and full effect should have been given to the provision in such agreement which deprived a retiring partner of any interest in accounts receivable, if he continued to practice in the same county within one year. Thickman v. Schunk, 410 P.2d 987,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1966).

Mineral interest held, following partner's death and partnership's termination, by successors in interest. —

It mattered not if the interest in a mineral interest was acquired by a party through the original land purchase as a partner or as a co-tenant. Whatever right was originally acquired was held, following the party's death, and the subsequent termination of the partnership, by the party's successors in interest as co-tenants. Simpson v. Kistler Inv. Co., 713 P.2d 751,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1986).

No post-dissolution profits attributable to property rights. —

The trial court did not err in finding that there were no post-dissolution profits attributable to one partner's property rights in office furniture and a truck, where the other partner had conducted all of the business and provided all of the services, and where the profits earned were attributable to her labor. Weisbrod v. Ely, 767 P.2d 171,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1989).

Nonmanaging partner was not denied his right to “an account of his interest,”

where the effect of dissolution litigation was an accounting in the trial court, and the parties introduced into evidence the income and expense statements of the partnership for all the relevant years, conflicting appraisals of the value of the business, and testimony concerning the business affairs of the partnership. Weisbrod v. Ely, 767 P.2d 171,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Rights of a Wrongdoing Partner,” see X Wyo. L.J. 200 (1956).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1048, 1076, 1200 to 1230.

“Book value” in partnership agreement in determining value of partner's interest, 47 ALR2d 1425.

Duty to estate of deceased partner on purchase of interest of deceased partner by surviving partner, 60 ALR2d 917.

Accountability for goodwill on dissolution of partnership, 65 ALR2d 521.

Right of surviving member of law firm to compensation for services in respect of business unfinished at time of partner's death, 78 ALR2d 280.

When statute of limitations commences to run on right of partnership accounting, 44 ALR4th 678.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 336 to 401.

§ 17-21-801.
Events causing dissolution and winding up of partnership business.

A partnership is dissolved and its business shall be wound up only upon:

Except as provided in W.S.

17-21-802

, receipt by a partnership at will of notice from a partner, other than a partner who is dissociated under W.S. 17-21-601(a)(ii) through (x), of that partner’s express will to withdraw as a partner or upon any later date specified in the notice;

In a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking:

Except as provided in W.S.

17-21-802

, within ninety (90) days after a partner’s wrongful dissociation under W.S.

17-21-602

or a partner’s dissociation by death or otherwise under W.S. 17-21-601(a)(vi) through (x), receipt by the partnership of notice from another partner of that partner’s express will to withdraw as a partner;

The express will of all the partners; or

The expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking unless all the partners agree to continue the business, in which case the partnership agreement is deemed amended retroactively to provide that the expiration or completion does not result in the dissolution and winding up of the partnership business.

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement resulting in the winding up of the partnership business, unless all the partners agree to continue the business, in which case the partnership agreement is deemed amended retroactively to provide that the event does not result in the dissolution and winding up of the partnership business;

An event that makes it unlawful for all or substantially all of the business of the partnership to be continued, but any cure of illegality within ninety (90) days after notice to the partnership of the event is effective retroactively to the date of the event for purposes of this section;

On application by a partner, a judicial decree that:

The economic purpose of the partnership is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

Another partner has engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business that makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner; or

It is not otherwise reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

On application by a transferee of a partner’s transferable interest, a judicial decree that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business:

If the partnership was for a definite term or particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking; or

If the partnership was a partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer, at any time.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Obligation created. —

As applied to partners in a professional firm, the work in process rule stated in this section creates a specific obligation and a specific limitation; the obligation the work in process rule creates is that during the winding-up state, the individual partners have a fiduciary duty to collect and allocate fees for work of the partnership that continued after dissolution. Smith, Keller & Assocs. v. Dorr & Assocs., 875 P.2d 1258,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1994) (decided under former § 17-13-605).

Partner failing to elect option to continue business cannot object. —

When partnership agreement provided that a remaining partner had an option to carry on the business but was not obligated to do so and he did not make his election prior to an attempted rescission of his partners' resignation, he could not object to the jurisdiction of the court to hear their complaint for dissolution under this section. Thickman v. Schunk, 391 P.2d 939,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1964) (decided under former § 17-13-603).

Summary judgment is a procedure that can be used

in an action for the dissolving of a partnership even though this was formerly a case in equity, since the distinction between law and equity has been abolished. Thickman v. Schunk, 391 P.2d 939,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1964) (decided under former § 17-13-603).

Giving effect to terms of partnership agreement. —

Where defendant chose to carry on the business of a medical clinic and had done so, and he did not cause a dissolution of the partnership in contravention of a partnership agreement, the winding up of partnership affairs, the settling of accounts between the partners, and the distribution of assets should have been under the terms of the partnership agreement; and full effect should have been given to the provision in such agreement which deprived a retiring partner of any interest in accounts receivable, if he continued to practice in the same county within one year. Thickman v. Schunk, 410 P.2d 987,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1966) (decided under former § 17-13-604).

Mortgaging property. —

A surviving partner may mortgage partnership property for the purpose of paying partnership debts, as it is his duty to wind up the affairs of the partnership. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 303, 11 P.2d 590,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1932) (decided under former law).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sale or transfer of interest by partner as dissolving partnership, 75 ALR2d 1036.

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution, 20 ALR4th 122.

§ 17-21-802.
Dissolution deferred ninety days.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a partnership of more than two (2) persons is not dissolved until ninety (90) days after receipt by the partnership of notice from a partner under W.S. 17-21-801(a)(i) or (ii)(A) and its business may be continued until that date as if no notice were received. Before that date, the partner who gave the notice may waive the right to have the partnership business wound up. If there is no waiver before that date, the partnership is dissolved and its business must be wound up.

A partnership may be dissolved at any time during the ninety (90) day period and its business wound up by the express will of at least one-half (1/2) of the other partners.

After receipt by the partnership of notice from a partner under W.S. 17-21-801(a)(i) or (ii)(A), the partner who gave the notice:

Has no rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business if it is continued under subsection (a) of this section, but may participate in winding up the business under W.S.

17-21-804

if the partnership is dissolved on or before the expiration of the ninety (90) day period pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section;

Is liable for obligations incurred during the period only to the extent a dissociated partner would be liable under W.S. 17-21-702(b) or 17-21-703(b), but is not liable for contributions for and shall be indemnified by the other partners against any partnership liability incurred by another partner to the extent the liability is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business; and

With respect to profits or losses incurred during the period, shall be credited with a share of any profits but shall be charged with a share of any losses only to the extent of profits credited for the period.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-803.
Partnership continues after dissolution.

A partnership continues after dissolution until the winding up of its business is completed, at which time the partnership is terminated.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Evidence held to show property partnership property. —

See B & R Builders v. Beilgard, 915 P.2d 1195,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 17-21-804.
Right to wind up partnership business.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated has a right to participate in winding up the partnership’s business, but on application of any partner, partner’s legal representative or transferee, the court, for good cause, may order judicial supervision of the winding up.

The legal representative of the last surviving partner may wind up a partnership’s business.

A person winding up a partnership’s business may preserve the partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal or administrative, settle and close the partnership’s business, dispose of and transfer the partnership’s property, discharge the partnership’s liabilities, distribute the assets of the partnership pursuant to W.S.

17-21-808

and perform other necessary acts, including settlement of disputes by mediation or arbitration.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-805.
Partner's power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to W.S.

17-21-806

, a partnership is bound by a partner’s act after dissolution that:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

Would have bound the partnership under W.S.

17-21-301

before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction does not have notice of the dissolution.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-21-806.
Statement of dissolution.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.

A statement of dissolution cancels a filed statement of partnership authority for the purposes of W.S. 17-21-303(d) and is a limitation on authority for the purposes of W.S. 17-21-303(e).

For purposes of W.S.

17-21-301

and

17-21-805

, a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners’ authority as a result of the statement of dissolution ninety (90) days after it is filed.

After filing and where appropriate, recording a statement of dissolution, the dissolved partnership may file and where appropriate, record a statement of partnership authority which shall operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in W.S. 17-21-303(d) and (e) in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 17-21-807.
Partner's liability to other partners after dissolution.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 17-21-802(c)(ii), after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner’s share of any partnership liability incurred under W.S.

17-21-805

for which the partner is personally liable under W.S.

17-21-306

.

A partner who, with knowledge of the winding up, incurs a partnership liability under W.S. 17-21-805(a)(ii) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any loss caused to the partnership arising from that liability.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

Evidence of bill of sale. —

In action for dissolution of partnership and for an accounting, defended on ground that plaintiff had no interest in alleged partnership business, testimony that third party, who had agreed to sell the property to plaintiff and defendant, thereafter executed bill of sale to defendant alone, was admissible under subsection (b) of this section to show plaintiff was without interest in the business. Le Gault v. Lewis-Zimmerman, 28 Wyo. 474, 206 P. 157,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1922) (decided under former § 17-13-608).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Relative rights of surviving partner and estate of deceased partner in proceeds of life insurance acquired pursuant to partnership agreement, 83 ALR2d 1347.

Liability of transferor of business operated under trade name for supplies furnished to successor by one without notice of the transfer, 70 ALR3d 1250.

§ 17-21-808.
Settlement of accounts among partners.

In winding up the partnership business, the assets of the partnership shall be applied to discharge its obligations to creditors, including partners who are creditors. Any surplus shall be applied to pay in cash the net amount distributable to partners in accordance with their right to distributions pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Each partner is entitled to a settlement of all partnership accounts upon winding up the partnership business. In settling accounts among the partners, the profits and losses that result from the liquidation of the partnership assets shall be credited and charged to the partners’ accounts. The partnership shall make a distribution to a partner in an amount equal to that partner’s positive balance. A partner shall contribute to the partnership an amount equal to that partner’s negative balance only to the extent that negative balance is attributable to an obligation for which that partner is personally liable under W.S.

17-21-306

.

To the extent not taken into account in settling the accounts among partners pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, each partner shall contribute in the proportion in which the partner shares partnership losses, the amount necessary to satisfy those partnership obligations for which the partner is personally liable under W.S.

17-21-306

. If a partner fails or is not obligated to contribute, the other partners shall contribute in the proportions in which the partners share partnership losses, the additional amount necessary to satisfy those partnership obligations for which the partners are personally liable under W.S.

17-21-306

. A partner or partner’s legal representative may recover from the other partners any contributions the partner makes to the extent the amount contributed exceeds that partner’s share of the partnership obligations but only to the extent such contributions are made on account of obligations for which the other partners are liable under W.S. 17-21-306.

The estate of a deceased partner is liable for the partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership under subsection (b) of this section.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a partnership or a partner or a person appointed by the court to represent creditors of a partnership or a partner, may enforce a partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

Applied

in

B & R Builders v. Beilgard, 915 P.2d 1195,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1996); Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).